Hawaii statutes.
§378-38 Rules and regulations. The
director of labor and industrial relations shall adopt rules and regulations as
the director deems necessary for the purpose of carrying out this part. [L
1967, c 22, pt of §1; HRS §378-38; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next